Massachusetts, session 194th, H4325.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended to add the following new
subsection:
B.(a) (17). In addition to any other deduction from Part B income so-called, a taxpayer
may deduct any fee paid to a municipality or public school district for the purpose of
transportation for a student to or from a public school, and/or participation by a student in an
athletic, academic, enrichment or student activity program at a public school.”
of 1